Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Chapter 95. Social Workers.

Cross references. —

For statement of legislative purpose in connection with the enactment of this chapter, see sec. 1, ch. 126, SLA 1988 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For board of social work examiners, see 12 AAC 18.

Collateral references. —

Social worker malpractice, 58 ALR4th 977.